Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 17.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-4840
Other prohibited acts; penalty.

A person
that, in order to obtain a financial gain, intentionally falsifies, forges,
conceals, defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or revocation
of a document of gift, or a refusal commits a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 17.